Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1386XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1386XD (3) 91
th/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 452A.53, subsection 5, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
5. Each vehicle operated into or through Iowa in interstate
operations using motor fuel, special fuel, or electric fuel
acquired in any other state shall carry in or on the vehicle a
duplicate or evidence of the permit or license required in this
section. A fee not to exceed fifty cents shall be charged The
state department of transportation shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 17A to set the fee for each duplicate or other
evidence of a permit or license issued.